en: Instant herbal teas
hu: Instant gyógynövényes teák
nl: Instanttheebereidingen

en: Absinthium, Absinthe wormwood
de: Wermuttee
es: Ajenjo, Artemisia absinthium
fr: Absinthium, Armoise Absinthe
hr: Absinthium
hu: Fehér üröm tea, üröm tea, ürmös tea
it: Artemisia absinthium
la: Artemisia absinthium
nl: Absint-alsem
pl: Piołun, Bylica Piołun
zh: 苦艾草

en: Alexandrian senna
de: Sennes, Senna
es: Senna, Sen
fr: Senna angustifolia
hr: Aleksandrijska sena
hu: Szenna tea
it: Senna
la: Senna alexandrina, Cassia angustifolia, Senna angustifolia
nl: Sennapeul
pl: Senes ostrolistny, Kasja ostrolistna
zh: 番泻叶

en: Maca, Maca powder, Peruvian ginseng
xx: Maca
la: Lepidium meyenii
nl: Maca, Maca Poeder

en: Mongolian milkvetch
fr: Astragale de Mongolie
la: Astragalus mongholicus, Astragalus propinquus, Astragalus membranaceus
mn: Хунчир
zh: 黃芪

en: Boldo
xx: Boldo
de: Boldo
es: Boldo
fr: Boldo
hr: Boldo
hu: Boldó
it: Boldo
la: Peumus boldus
nl: Boldo
pl: Boldo

en: Camomile teas, Camomile infusions, Camomile, Chamomile
bg: Лайка
da: Kamilleteer
de: Kamille
es: Manzanilla
fi: kamomilla
fr: Camomille
hr: Kamilica
hu: Kamilla
it: Camomilla
ja: カモミール
lt: Ramunėlės
nl: Kamille
pl: Rumianek
sv: Kamomillteer, Kamomill

en: Camomile teas in tea bags
da: Kamilleteer i pose
sv: Kamomillteer i pås

en: German camomile teas, German chamomile
de: Deutsche Kamille
es: Manzanilla dulce, Manzanilla de Castilla, Manzanilla alemana
fr: Camomille sauvage
hr: Njemačka kamilica
hu: Német kamilla
it: Camomilla comune, Camomilla tedesca
la: Matricaria chamomilla, Matricaria recutita
nl: Echte Kamille
pl: Rumianek pospolity

en: Roman camomile teas, Roman chamomile, English chamomile, Garden chamomile
de: Römische Kamille
es: Manzanilla amarga, Manzanilla común, Manzanilla romana
fr: Camomille romaine
hr: Rimska kamilica
hu: Román kamilla
it: Camomilla romana
la: Chamaemelum nobile, Anthemis nobilis
nl: Roomse Kamille
pl: Rumian rzymski

en: Common nettle, Stinging nettle
bg: Коприва
de: Brennessel
es: Ortiga verde, Ortiga mayor
fr: Grande ortie, Ortie dioïque, Ortie commune
hr: Obična kopriva
hu: Csalán
it: Ortica
ja: イラクサ
la: Urtica dioica
lt: Paprastoji dilgėlė, Dilgėlė
nl: Brandnetel
pl: Pokrzywa zwyczajna

en: Cotton lavender, Lavender-cotton
de: Heiligenkraut
es: Manzanilla de Mahón, Abrótano hembra
fr: Santoline petit cyprès
hr: Pamuk lavanda
la: Santolina chamaecyparissus
nl: Heiligenbloem
pl: Santolina cyprysikowata

en: Dandelion herbal tea
pl: Herbata ziołowa z mniszka lekarskiego

en: Dandelion, Common dandelion
af: perdeblom
ar: Խատուտիկ սովորական
az: Dərman zəncirotu
be: Адуванчык лекавы
bg: обикновено глухарче
bh: टॅराक्सॅकम ऑफिशिनाले
ca: xicoia, dent de lleó
ce: Да́рбане ба́ппа
cs: pampeliška lékařská, Pampelišky smetánky
da: Mælkebøtte
de: Löwenzahn
el: ταράξακο
eo: oficina taraksako, ofta leontodo
es: Diente de león
et: Harilik võilill
eu: Txikoria-belarra
fa: قاصدک, گل قاصدک
fi: voikukka
fr: Pissenlit commun, Pissenlit officinal, Pissenlit cru
fy: Hynsteblom
ga: caisearbhán, caisearbhán coiteann
gl: mexacán común
he: שינן רפואי
hr: ljekoviti maslačak
hu: Gyermekláncfű, Kutyatej
hy: Խատուտիկ սովորական
id: jombang, tanaman jombang
is: Túnfífill
it: Tarassaco, Dente di leone
ja: タンポポ, セイヨウタンポポ
ko: 서양민들레
ku: Xizêmok
ky: Каакым-кукум
la: Taraxacum officinale
li: pisblóm
lt: kiaulpienė
lv: cūkpiene, ārstniecības pienene
ml: ദുഗ്ധഫേനി
ms: Dandelion
nl: Paardenbloem, Paardebloem
nn: løvetann
pl: Mniszek lekarski
pt: dente-de-leão
rm: flur-portg
ro: Păpădie, Păpădia
ru: одуванчик, Одува́нчик лека́рственный
sk: Púpava lekárska
sl: regrat, Navadni regrat
sr: Маслачак, Maslačak
sv: maskros
tr: karahindiba
uk: кульбаба
vi: địa đinh
wa: Såvadje cécoreye
zh: 西洋蒲公英

en: Devil's claw, Grapple plant, Wood spider
de: Teufelskralle
es: Harpagofito
fr: Harpagophyton, Griffe du diable, Sengaparile
hr: Đavolja kandža
hu: Ördögcsáklya
la: Harpagophytum procumbens
nl: Duivelsklauw

en: Elderberry products
bg: Продукти от бъз
de: Holunderprodukte
es: Productos del saúco
fr: Produits de sureau noir
hr: Proizvodi od bazge
hu: Bodzaalapú termékek
it: Prodotti a base di sambuco
la: Sambucus nigra
lt: Šeivamedžio uogų produktai
nl: Gewone vlier

en: Elderberry flowers
de: Holunderblüte
es: Flores de saúco, Flores de saúco común
fr: Fleurs de sureau noir
hr: Cvjetovi bazge
hu: Bodzavirág
it: Fiori di sambuco
lt: Šeivamedžio žiedai
nl: Gewone vlierbloemen
pl: Kwiaty czarnego bzu

en: Eucalyptus
bg: Евкалипт
de: Eukalyptus
es: Eucalipto
fr: Eucalyptus
hr: Eukaliptus
hu: Eukaliptusz
it: Eucalipto
ja: ユーカリ
la: Eucalyptus
lt: Eukaliptas
nl: Eucalyptus
pl: Eukaliptus
ro: Eucalipt

en: Field horsetail, Common horsetail
de: Schachtelhalm
es: Cola de caballo
fr: Prêle des champs
hr: Poljska preslica
hu: Zsurló
it: Equiseto dei campi
ja: スギナ
la: Equisetum arvense
lt: Lauko asiūklis, Paprastasis asiūklis
nl: Heermoes
pl: Skrzyp polny

en: Fruit teas
da: Frugtteer
de: Früchtetees
es: Infusiones con frutas
fi: hedelmäteet
fr: Infusions aux fruits
hr: Voćni čajevi
hu: Gyümölcsteák, Gyümölcs tea
it: Tisane alla frutta, Infusi alla frutta
lt: Vaisinės arbatos, vaisių arbatos
nl: Vruchtentheeën, Vruchtenthee
pl: Herbatki owocowe
ro: Ceaiuri de fructe, Ceai de fructe
sv: Fruktteer
zh: 水果茶